California statutes. Probate Code
(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9964.

(a) The court shall make an order authorizing the personal representative to grant the option upon the terms and conditions stated in the order if the court is satisfied as to all of the following:

(1) Good reason exists to grant the option and granting the option will be to the advantage of the estate.

(2) It does not appear that a higher offer with respect to the purchase price of the real property subject to the option may be obtained. An offer is a higher offer with respect to purchase price only if the offer satisfies the requirements of Section 10311 governing increased bids in real property sales.

(3) It does not appear that a better offer with respect to the terms of the option may be obtained. An offer is a better offer with respect to the terms of the option only if the offer is materially more advantageous to the estate.

(b) A higher offer made either for cash or on credit, whether on the same or different credit terms, or a better offer, shall be considered only if the personal representative informs the court in person or by counsel, before the court makes its order authorizing the granting of the option, that the offer is acceptable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9965.

An option granted pursuant to an order made under this chapter, whether within or beyond the administration of the estate, is subject to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 884.010) of Title 5 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Civil Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9966.

No omission, error, or irregularity in the proceedings under this chapter shall impair or invalidate the proceedings or the granting of an option pursuant to an order made under this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 17. Option to Purchase Given in Will [9980. - 9983.]

9980.

(a) Where an option to purchase real or personal property is given in a will, the person given the option has the right to exercise the option at any time within the time limits provided by the will. For the purposes of this section, if a time limitation in the will is measured from the death of the testator, that time shall be extended by the period between the testator’s death and the issuance of letters testamentary or of administration with the will annexed or by six months, whichever is the shorter period.

(b) If the will does not provide a time limit for exercise of the option, the time limit is one year from the death of the decedent.

(c) Subject to subdivision (b), if the option given in the will is exercisable under the terms of the will after the time that the estate would otherwise be closed, the property subject to the option shall be distributed subject to the option.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9981.

(a) Where an option to purchase real or personal property is given in a will admitted to probate, the court may make an order under this chapter directing the personal representative to transfer or convey the property to the person given the option upon compliance with the terms and conditions stated in the will.

(b) The personal representative or the person given the option to purchase the property may file a petition for an order pursuant to this chapter.

(c) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given as provided in Section 1220.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9982.

The court shall not make an order under this chapter unless one of the following requirements is satisfied:

(a) The court determines that the rights of creditors will not be impaired by the making of the order.

(b) The court requires a bond in an amount and with such surety as the court shall direct or approve.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

9983.

No omission, error, or irregularity in the proceedings under this chapter shall impair or invalidate the proceedings or the transfer or conveyance made pursuant to an order made under this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 18. Sales [10000. - 10382.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [10000. - 10006.]

10000.

Subject to the limitations, conditions, and requirements of this chapter, the personal representative may sell real or personal property of the estate in any of the following cases:

(a) Where the sale is necessary to pay debts, devises, family allowance, expenses of administration, or taxes.

(b) Where the sale is to the advantage of the estate and in the best interest of the interested persons.

(c) Where the property is directed by the will to be sold.

(d) Where authority is given in the will to sell the property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10001.

(a) If the personal representative neglects or refuses to sell the property, any interested person may petition the court for an order requiring the personal representative to sell real or personal property of the estate in any of the following cases:

(1) Where the sale is necessary to pay debts, devises, family allowance, expenses of administration, or taxes.

(2) Where the sale is to the advantage of the estate and in the best interest of the interested persons.

(3) Where the property is directed by the will to be sold.

(b) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given as provided in Section 1220.

(c) Notice of the hearing on the petition also shall be given to the personal representative by citation served at least five days before the hearing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10002.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), if directions are given in the will as to the mode of selling or the particular property to be sold, the personal representative shall comply with those directions.

(b) If the court determines that it would be to the advantage of the estate and in the best interest of the interested persons, the court may make an order relieving the personal representative of the duty to comply with the directions in the will. The order shall specify the mode and the terms and conditions of selling or the particular property to be sold, or both. The personal representative or any interested person may file a petition for an order under this subdivision. Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given as provided in Section 1220.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10003.

Subject to Part 4 (commencing with Section 21400) of Division 11 and to Sections 10001 and 10002, if estate property is required or permitted to be sold, the personal representative may:

(a) Use discretion as to which property to sell first.

(b) Sell the entire interest of the estate in the property or any lesser interest therein.

(c) Sell the property either at public auction or private sale.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10004.

(a) Where the personal representative determines in his or her discretion that, by use or relationship, any assets of the estate, whether real or personal, constitute a unit for purposes of sale, the personal representative may cause the property to be appraised as a unit.

(b) Whether or not the property is appraised as a unit, the personal representative may sell all the assets described in subdivision (a) as a unit and under one bid if the court finds the sale of the assets as a unit to be to the advantage of the estate.

(c) No private sale of the assets as a unit may be made for less than 90 percent of the sum of the appraised values of the personal property and the sum of the appraised values of the real property, appraised separately, or for less than 90 percent of the appraised value if appraised as a unit.

(d) If the assets to be sold as a unit include any real property, the sale shall be made in the manner provided for the sale of real property, and the bid and sale are subject to the limitations and restrictions established for the sale of real property. If the assets to be sold as a unit are entirely personal property, the property shall be sold in the manner provided for the sale of personal property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10005.

(a) If any property in the estate is sold for more than the appraised value, the personal representative shall account for the proceeds of sale, including the excess over the appraised value.

(b) If any property in the estate is sold for less than the appraised value and the sale has been made in accordance with law, the personal representative is not responsible for the loss.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10006.

If property in the estate is to be sold as an undivided interest in a cotenancy, the other cotenants may file in the estate proceeding written consent to have their interests sold pursuant to this chapter. Thereafter, the court’s orders made pursuant to this chapter are as binding on the consenting cotenants as on the personal representative.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Contract With Agent, Broker, or Auctioneer [10150. - 10151.]

10150.

(a) The personal representative may enter into a written contract with either or both of the following:

(1) A licensed real estate broker to secure a purchaser for any real property of the estate. The broker may associate other licensed real estate brokers for this purpose, including use of a multiple listing service as defined in Section 1087 of the Civil Code.

(2) One or more agents or brokers to secure a purchaser for any personal property of the estate. If the particular property to be sold or the particular manner of sale requires that the agent or broker be licensed, the contract may be made only with an agent or broker that is so licensed.

(b) The contract may provide for payment of a fee, commission, or other compensation out of the proceeds of sale, but the contract is binding and valid as against the estate only for such amount as the court allows pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 10160). No liability of any kind is incurred by the estate under the contract or a sale unless the sale is confirmed by the court, except for the obligations of the estate to the purchaser of personal property as to which title passes pursuant to Section 10259 without court confirmation or approval. The personal representative is not personally liable on the contract by reason of execution of the contract.

(c) The contract may grant an exclusive right to sell property for a period not in excess of 90 days if, prior to execution of the contract granting an exclusive right to sell, the personal representative obtains permission of the court to enter into the contract upon a showing of necessity and advantage to the estate. The court may grant the permission when the personal representative is appointed or at any subsequent time upon ex parte application. The personal representative may execute one or more extensions of the contract granting an exclusive right to sell property, each extension being for a period not to exceed 90 days, if for each extension the personal representative obtains permission of the court upon ex parte application to extend the contract upon a showing of necessity and advantage to the estate of the extension.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10151.

(a) The personal representative may enter into a written contract with any of the following:

(1) Where the public auction sale will be held in this state, an auctioneer who is qualified to conduct business under Title 2.95 (commencing with Section 1812.600) of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code.

(2) Where the public auction sale will be held outside this state pursuant to an order made under Section 10254, an auctioneer who is legally permitted in the jurisdiction where the sale will be held to conduct a public auction sale and to secure purchasers by that method for the personal property authorized to be sold by public auction sale in that jurisdiction under the court order.

(b) The contract shall be one that is legally enforceable under the law of the jurisdiction where made.

(c) The contract may provide for payment to the auctioneer of a fee, commission, or other compensation out of the proceeds of sale and for reimbursement of expenses, but the contract is binding and valid as against the estate only for such amounts as the court allows pursuant to Section 10167. No liability of any kind is incurred by the estate under the contract or a sale unless the sale is approved by the court, except for the obligations of the estate to the purchaser of personal property as to which title passes pursuant to Section 10259 without court confirmation or approval. The personal representative is not personally liable on the contract by reason of execution of the contract.

(d) The contract may provide that personal property of two or more estates being administered by the same personal representative may be sold at the same public auction sale. Items of personal property may be sold separately or in a lot with other items from the same estate. A sale pursuant to the contract shall be with reserve. The auctioneer shall comply with the instructions of the personal representative with respect to withdrawal of items, risk of loss, place of delivery, warranties, and other matters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 32, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Compensation of Agent, Broker, or Auctioneer [10160. - 10168.]

10160.

The estate is not liable to an agent, broker, or auctioneer under a contract for the sale of property or for any fee, commission, or other compensation or expenses in connection with a sale of property unless the following requirements are satisfied:

(a) An actual sale is made.

(b) If court confirmation or approval is required, the sale is confirmed or approved by the court as required.

(c) The sale is consummated.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10160.5.

The estate is not liable to an agent or broker under a contract for the sale of property or for any fee, commission, or other compensation or expenses in connection with sale of the property in either of the following cases:

(a) Where the agent or broker, directly or indirectly, is the purchaser of the property.

(b) Where the agent or broker representing the purchaser to whom the sale is confirmed has any interest in the purchaser.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10161.

(a) Subject to the provisions of this article, whether or not the agent or broker has a contract with the personal representative, the fee, commission, or other compensation of an agent or broker in connection with a sale of property shall be the amount the court, in its discretion, determines to be a reasonable compensation for the services of the agent or broker to the estate.

(b) Unless the agent or broker holds a contract granting an exclusive right to sell the property, an agent or broker is not entitled to any fee, commission, or other compensation for services to the estate in connection with a sale except in the following cases:

(1) Where the agent or broker produces the original bid which is returned to the court for confirmation.

(2) Where the property is sold on an increased bid, made at the time of the hearing on the petition for confirmation, to a purchaser procured by the agent or broker.

(c) If the agent or broker has a contract with the personal representative, the amount of the compensation of the agent or broker in connection with the sale of property shall not exceed the amount provided for in the contract.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10162.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), where the bid returned to the court for confirmation is made by a person who is not represented by an agent or broker and the successful bidder is represented by an agent or broker, the compensation of the agent or broker who procured the purchaser to whom the sale is confirmed shall not exceed one-half of the difference between the amount of the bid in the original return and the amount of the successful bid.

(b) This section does not limit the compensation of the agent or broker who holds a contract under Section 10150 granting him or her the exclusive right to sell the property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10162.3.

(a) This section applies if all of the following circumstances exist:

(1) There is no agent or broker holding a contract under Section 10150 granting the exclusive right to sell the property.

(2) The bid returned to court for confirmation is made by a purchaser represented by an agent or broker.

(3) The court confirms the sale to that purchaser either on the bid returned to court for confirmation or on an increased bid made at the time of the hearing on the petition for confirmation.

(b) If all the circumstances described in subdivision (a) exist, the court shall allow the agent or broker who procured the purchaser to whom the sale is confirmed the compensation determined under Section 10161 on the full amount for which the sale is confirmed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10162.5.

Subject to Section 10162.6, where an agent or broker holds a contract under Section 10150 granting the exclusive right to sell the property, the court shall allow to the agent or broker holding the contract the compensation determined under Section 10161 on:

(a) The full amount for which the sale is confirmed in either of the following circumstances:

(1) The bid returned to the court for confirmation is made by a purchaser who is not represented by an agent or broker and the court confirms the sale to that purchaser on that bid.

(2) The bid returned to the court for confirmation is made by a purchaser who is represented by the agent or broker holding the contract and the court confirms the sale to that purchaser on an increased bid made at the time of the hearing on the petition for confirmation.

(b) The amount of the original bid if both of the following circumstances exist:

(1) The bid returned to court for confirmation is made by a purchaser who is not represented by an agent or broker or who is represented by the agent or broker holding a contract under Section 10150 granting the exclusive right to sell the property.

(2) The court confirms the sale on an increased bid, made at the time of the hearing on the petition for confirmation, to a purchaser who was not procured by a bona fide agent or broker.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10162.6.

(a) This section applies if both of the following circumstances exist:

(1) An agent or broker holds a contract under Section 10150 granting the exclusive right to sell the property.

(2) The contract provides that no compensation is payable to the agent or broker holding the contract if sale is confirmed to a particular purchaser named in the contract.

(b) If the court confirms the sale to the purchaser named in the contract, whether on an original bid returned to the court or on an increased bid made at the time of the hearing on the petition for confirmation, the compensation of any agents or brokers involved in the sale is determined as provided in this article, except that no compensation is payable to the agent or broker holding the contract.

(c) If the court confirms the sale to a purchaser other than the person named in the contract, whether on an original bid returned to the court or on an increased bid made at the time of the hearing on the petition for confirmation, the compensation of the agent or broker holding the contract, and of any other agents or brokers involved in the sale, is determined under this article as if the limitation in the contract did not exist.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10162.7.

(a) Subject to Section 10162.6, this section applies if all of the following circumstances exist:

(1) There is an agent or broker holding a contract under Section 10150 granting the exclusive right to sell the property.

(2) The bid returned to court for confirmation is made by a purchaser procured by another agent or broker.

(3) The court confirms the sale to that purchaser either on the bid returned to court for confirmation or on an increased bid made at the time of the hearing on the petition for confirmation.

(b) If all the circumstances described in subdivision (a) exist, the court shall allow the compensation determined under Section 10161 on the full amount for which the sale is confirmed. The compensation allowed by the court shall be divided between the agent or broker holding the contract and the other agent or broker as is provided in any agreement between the agent or broker holding the contract and the other agent or broker. If there is no agreement, the compensation on the amount of the original bid returned to the court shall be divided equally between the agent or broker holding the contract and the other agent or broker and, if the sale is confirmed on an increased bid, the other agent or broker shall be paid all of the compensation on the difference between the original bid and the amount for which the sale is confirmed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10163.

Subject to Sections 10162 and 10162.6, where the original bid returned to the court for confirmation was made by a purchaser who was not procured by an agent or broker, the court shall allow the compensation determined under Section 10161 on the full amount for which the sale is confirmed to the agent or broker who procured the purchaser to whom the sale is confirmed if either of the following conditions is satisfied:

(a) The court confirms a sale on an increased bid, made at the time of the hearing on the petition for confirmation, to a purchaser procured by an agent or broker holding a contract under Section 10150 granting the exclusive right to sell the property.

(b) There is no agent or broker holding a contract under Section 10150 granting the exclusive right to sell the property and the court confirms a sale on an increased bid, made at the time of the hearing on the petition for confirmation, to a purchaser procured by a bona fide agent or broker.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10164.

(a) This section applies only where the court confirms a sale on an increased bid, made at the time of the hearing on the petition for confirmation, to a purchaser who was not procured by a bona fide agent or broker.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the court shall allow the compensation determined under Section 10161 on the amount of the original bid to the agent or broker whose original bid was returned to the court.

(c) If an agent or broker holds a contract under Section 10150 granting the exclusive right to sell the property and the original bid returned to the court is made by a purchaser who was procured by another agent or broker, the compensation determined under Section 10161 on the amount of the original bid shall be divided between the agent or broker holding the contract and the other agent or broker as is provided in any agreement between the agent or broker holding the contract and the other agent or broker. If there is no agreement, the compensation shall be divided equally between the agent or broker holding the contract and the other agent or broker.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10165.

(a) Subject to Section 10162.6, where the court confirms a sale on an increased bid, made at the time of the hearing on the petition for confirmation, to a purchaser procured by a bona fide agent or broker, the court shall allow the compensation determined under Section 10161 on the full amount for which the sale is confirmed, as provided in this section, if either of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) The original bid returned to the court for confirmation was made by a purchaser who was procured by another agent or broker.

(2) The original bid returned to the court for confirmation was made by a purchaser who was not represented by an agent or broker, and another agent or broker holds a contract under Section 10150 granting the exclusive right to sell the property.

(b) The agent or broker who procured the purchaser to whom the sale is confirmed shall be paid one-half of the compensation on the amount of the original bid and all of the compensation on the difference between the original bid and the amount for which the sale is confirmed.

(c) The other one-half of the compensation on the amount of the original bid shall be paid as follows:

(1) If the original bid returned to the court is made by a purchaser who was procured by the agent or broker holding a contract under Section 10150 granting the exclusive right to sell the property, the entire one-half of the compensation on the original bid shall be paid to that agent or broker.

(2) If the original bid returned to the court is made by a purchaser who was procured by a bona fide agent or broker and there is no agent or broker holding a contract under Section 10150 granting the exclusive right to sell the property, the entire one-half of the compensation on the original bid shall be paid to that agent or broker.

(3) If there is an agent or broker who holds a contract under Section 10150 granting the exclusive right to sell the property and the original bid returned to the court is made by a purchaser who was procured by another agent or broker, the one-half of the compensation on the amount of the original bid shall be divided between the agent or broker holding the contract granting the exclusive right to sell the property and the other agent or broker whose original bid was returned to the court for confirmation as is provided in any agreement between the agent or broker holding the contract and the other agent or broker. If there is no agreement, the one-half of the compensation on the amount of the original bid shall be divided equally between the agent or broker holding the contract and the other agent or broker whose original bid was returned to the court for confirmation.

(4) If there is an agent or broker who holds a contract under Section 10150 granting the exclusive right to sell the property and the original bid returned to the court is made by a purchaser who is not represented by an agent or broker and the court confirms the sale on an increased bid, made at the time of the hearing on the petition for confirmation, to a purchaser procured by another agent or broker, the entire one-half of the compensation on the original bid shall be paid to the agent or broker holding the contract.

(5) If the agent or broker compensated under subdivision (b) holds a contract under Section 10150 granting the exclusive right to sell the property, the entire one-half of the compensation on the original bid shall be paid to the other agent or broker who procured the original bid returned to the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10166.

Notwithstanding that a bid contains a condition that a certain amount of the bid shall be paid to an agent or broker by the personal representative, only such compensation as is proper under this article shall be allowed. Acceptance of the bid by the court binds the bidder even though the compensation allowed by the court is less than that specified by the condition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10167.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), whether or not the auctioneer has a contract with the personal representative, the fees, compensation, and expenses of an auctioneer in connection with a sale of property shall be the amount the court, in its discretion, determines to be a reasonable compensation for the services of the auctioneer to the estate.

(b) If the auctioneer has a contract with the personal representative, the amount of the compensation of the auctioneer in connection with the sale of property shall not exceed the amount provided for in the contract.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10168.

This article does not supersede any agreement cooperating agents or brokers may have among themselves to divide the compensation payable under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 710, Sec. 26.   Operative July 1, 1991, by Sec. 48 of Ch. 710.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Special Provisions Applicable to Particular Types of Property [10200. - 10207.]

10200.

(a) As used in this section, “securities” means “security” as defined in Section 70, land trust certificates, certificates of beneficial interest in trusts, investment trust certificates, mortgage participation certificates, or certificates of deposit for any of the foregoing, but does not include notes secured by a mortgage or deed of trust unless the note or notes have been authorized or permitted to be issued by the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation or have been made by a public utility subject to the Public Utilities Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 201) of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code).

(b) After authorization by order of court, securities may be sold or may be surrendered for redemption or conversion. Title to the securities
 sold or surrendered as authorized by an order obtained under this section passes without the need for subsequent court confirmation.

(c) To obtain an order under this section, the personal representative or any interested person shall file a petition stating the terms and conditions and the advantage to the estate of the proposed sale or redemption or conversion. If the court authorizes the sale, redemption, or conversion, the court’s order shall fix the terms and conditions of sale, redemption, or conversion.

(d) Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given as provided in Section 1220 and posted as provided in Section 1230, but the court may order that the notice be given for a shorter period or dispensed with.

(e) No notice of sale or of the redemption or conversion need be given if any of the following
 conditions are satisfied:

(1) The minimum selling price is fixed by the court.

(2) The securities are to be sold on an established stock or bond exchange.

(3) The securities to be sold are securities designated as a national market system security on an interdealer quotation system, or subsystem thereof, by the National Association of Securities Dealers, Inc., sold through a broker-dealer registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the regular course of business of the broker-dealer.

(4) The securities are to be surrendered for redemption or conversion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 207.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10201.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Federal association” is defined in Section 5102 of the Financial Code. 

(2) “Mutual capital certificate” is defined in Section 5111 of the Financial Code.

(3) “Savings account” is defined in Section 5116 of the Financial Code.

(4) “Savings association” is defined in Section 5102 of the Financial Code. 

(5) “Withdrawal value” is defined in Section 5124 of the Financial Code.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 10200, savings accounts and mutual capital certificates of a savings association or federal association may be sold or surrendered for withdrawal by the personal representative, and title thereto passed, without notice of sale, prior order of court, or subsequent confirmation by the court, if an amount of money is obtained upon the sale or withdrawal not less than the withdrawal value of the savings account or the value of the mutual capital certificate.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 10200, credit union share accounts and certificates for funds may be sold or withdrawn by the personal representative, and title thereto passed, without notice of sale, prior order of court, or subsequent confirmation by the court, if an amount of money is obtained upon the sale or withdrawal not less than the withdrawal value of the share account or the value of the certificate for funds.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10202.

Notwithstanding Section 10200, if an estate by reason of owning securities, also owns or receives subscription rights for the purchase of additional securities, the personal representative may sell all or part of the subscription rights without notice of sale, prior order of court, or subsequent confirmation by the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10203.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), where property to be sold consists of a leasehold interest, the sale shall be made as in the case of the sale of personal property of the estate.

(b) The sale of a leasehold interest shall be made as in the case of the sale of real property of the estate if the interest to be sold consists of any of the following:

(1) A leasehold interest in real property with an unexpired term of 10 years or longer. For this purpose, the leasehold interest shall be considered to have an unexpired term of 10 years or longer if the lessee has the right to extend the term and the term, if extended, would exceed 10 years.

(2) A leasehold interest in real property together with an option to purchase the leased property or some part thereof.

(3) A lease for the purpose of production of minerals, oil, gas, or other hydrocarbon substances, or geothermal energy.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10204.

Property of the estate that consists of a partnership interest or an interest belonging to an estate by virtue of a partnership formerly existing may be sold in the same manner as other personal property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10205.

A chose in action belonging to the estate may be sold in the same manner as other personal property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10206.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, if the decedent at the time of death was possessed of a contract for the purchase of real property and the decedent’s interest in the property and under the contract is to be sold, the sale shall be made as in the case of the sale of real property of the estate.

(b) If the decedent’s interest in the property and under the contract is sold, the sale shall be made subject to all payments which are due at the time of sale or which may thereafter become due on the contract. Except as provided in subdivision (d), if there are any payments due or to become due, the court shall not confirm the sale until the purchaser executes a bond to the personal representative that satisfies the requirements of subdivision (c).

(c) The bond shall be for the benefit and indemnity of the personal representative and the persons entitled to the interest of the decedent in the real property contracted for. The amount of the bond shall be equal to the amount of payments then due and thereafter to become due on the contract, with such sureties as the court may approve. The bond shall be conditioned that the purchaser will (1) make all payments for the property which are then due or which become due after the date of the sale and (2) fully indemnify the personal representative and the person entitled to the interest of the decedent against all demands, costs, charges, and expenses, by reason of any covenant or agreement contained in the contract.

(d) The bond need not be given in either of the following cases:

(1) Where no claim has been made against the estate on the contract and the time for filing claims has expired.

(2) Where the person entitled to payment under the contract waives all recourse to the assets of the estate for payment and releases the estate and the personal representative from liability for payment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

10207.

(a) Real property suitable for a shift-in-land-use loan to develop grazing or pasture facilities may be sold under this section by the personal representative to a grazing or pasture association in conformity with the federal Consolidated Farm and Rural Development Act (7 U.S.C. Sec. 1921, et seq.) after authorization by order of the court.

(b) The personal representative or any interested person may file a petition for an order under this section. Notice of the hearing on the petition shall be given as provided in Section 1220.

(c) An order for sale of property under this section may be made only if the court determines both of the following:

(1) Either the sale is made pursuant to the will of the decedent or all of the following have consented to the sale:

(A) Each known heir whose interest in the estate would be affected by the sale.

(B) Each known devisee who has an interest in the property under the decedent’s will.

(2) The sale will not jeopardize the rights of creditors of the estate.

(d) If the court makes an order authorizing sale of the property, the personal representative may make the sale in accord with the terms and conditions set out in the order, subject to the following requirements:

(1) Except as provided in Sections 10002, 10301, 10303, and 10503, notice of the time and place of the sale shall be published pursuant to Section 10300.

(2) The price of the sale made shall be not less than the value of the property as established by an independent and competent appraiser mutually acceptable to the federal government, the grazing or pasture association, and the personal representative.

(3) Except as provided in Sections 10002 and 10503, the sale shall be reported to and confirmed by the court as provided in Article 6 (commencing with Section 10300) before title to the property passes, but the sale may be made irrespective of whether a higher bid is made to the court at the hearing on the petition to confirm the sale.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Sale of Personal Property [10250. - 10264.]

10250.

Subject to Sections 10251 and 10252 and except as otherwise provided by statute, personal property of the estate may be sold only after notice of sale is given by one or both of the following methods, as the personal representative may determine:

(a) Posting at the county courthouse of the county in which the proceedings are pending at least 15 days before:

(1) In the case of a private sale, the day specified in the notice of sale as the day on or after which the sale is to be made.

(2) In the case of a public auction sale, the day of the auction.
